Tennessee, session 114, HB0389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-306(c), is amended by deleting
the language "thirty (30) days" and substituting "fourteen (14) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0389
001364
- 1 -